Tennessee, session 114, SB0404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-318(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1)
(A) The image was photographed or recorded under circumstances
where the parties agreed or understood that the image would remain private; or
(B) The image of an identifiable person was created or modified by
means of a computer software program, artificial intelligence application, or other
digital editing tools; and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0404
002047
- 1 -